src/org/daisy/dotify/hyphenator/impl/resource-files/dict/hyph_sv_SE.dic
.a2ba5k
.2aba
.a1b
.a2bal
.a2ban
.a2bas
.a2be
.a2bi5e
.a2bi1li
.a4b4is
.a2b3it
.a2bl2
.a2bo
.ab1ol
.a2b5r
.2a2by
.a2c1
.ac2k4e
.a4ck1
.a2da
.a2de
.a5de1k2
.a2do
.a2d1s1
.a2fa
.a1f
.a2fic
.a2fr
.a4fy
.a2g1
.a1g2a
.a2g4d
.agnos3
.ag1n
.ag1no
.ag2or
.a1go
.ag3ra
.2ag1r2
.a2ha
.a1h
.ai4n
.2ai
.a4ja
.a2kad4
.a1k2a
.2a2ki
.a2ku
.a2k1v
.a2la1b
.a1la
.a4la2r.
.a4la2r1n
.a4la2rs
.a4las
.a4l2e.
.a1le
.a2le1a
.a4len
.a2ler
.a4les
.a4let
.a2l4ex1
.a2l3f
.a2li
.al4l2t
.a2lo
.al2pj
.al1p
.al2pl
.al2p2r
.al2va
.am2br
.a2m1b
.a2mer
.a1me
.a2met
.am1ne3
.a2m1n
.a4mo1k
.a1mo
.a2m5s4
.2a3mu
.a4nad
.a1na
.a2n5ae
.a2nag
.a2nal
.an5a2l.
.an5a1la
.an5a1le
.a4na2n1d
.a2nar
.a2nas4
.a2n2at
.and5r4a.
.an2d1ra
.a2n1d
.and1r
.an4d4rar
.a2n1es
.a1ne
.an3g4e
.a2ng1
.a2nin
.a1ni
.a2nis
.a4n2it
.an1k5r4
.a2nk
.an4n4a.
.a2n1n
.an1na
.an4nas
.an4n2e.
.an1ne
.an2nel
.an4nes
.a2n2od
.a1no
.a2nom
.a2non
.a2nor
.a2n3s2
.anti3s
.a2n1t
.an1ti
.a4p4a.
.a1pa
.a5plas
.apl2a
.a2por
.a1po
.a2p1p2
.2a2p3u
.a4r4a.
.a1ra
.a2ri1a
.a1ri
.a2r4i1e
.a2ri1o
.a4risk
.ar5kv
.a2r1k
.ar5r
.2a2sa
.as5ar
.a4s5en
.a1se
.a4s5et
.a2si
.as2ke
.a3sket
.a1s4ki
.as2ta
.a3s2ten
.as1te
.a3s1ti
.as4to
.ast1r
.a3strä
.a2tol
.a1to
.1a2tom
.a1tr
.a2t1t2
.2a2va
.a1v3ak
.a4v2e.
.a1ve
.a2vel
.a2v5em
.a4ve2n.
.a4ve2ns
.a2ve2s
.a4vet
.a4v4i.
.a1vi
.a2vi1a
.a2vid
.a2vi1e
.a2vi2g
.avig5ar
.avi1ga
.a2vin
.a2vis
.av5isn2
.a2vo
.a2v3s2
.a2vu
.a4v5å
.a2vä
.1b2
.back4es
.ba4c4k1
.bac2ke
.bed2r
.be1d
.bi5on
.bi3sk5v
.b4is
.bi5s1ti
.blå5s4ta
.bl2
.b2o2ra
.bo2r2t
.bågs3v2
.b2åg
.bå2gs1
.ci3s2t
.1c2i
.4c5k2
.c2l
.2c2r
.cy1klop
.1c4y
.d2
.dam3sk
.1da
.da2ms
.dusch5ad
.1du
.d2us4c
.dusc2h
.dusch5at
.då5re
.dä2r1
.1dä
.e2a
.eb2r
.e1b
.e2da
.e4den
.e1d2e
.e4de2r.
.e2dis
.e1di
.e2dit
.e2d4v4
.e2g
.eg3a
.eg4n4a.
.e2g1n
.eg1na
.e2g4ne
.e4h
.e2i
.e2j
.e2k
.e1k1l
.ek5or
.ek5r4
.ek5v
.e2la1b
.e1la
.e2l4ak
.e2lan
.e2las
.e2le1f
.e1le
.e2le1g
.e2l1ek
.elek5tro2d.
.e2le2kt
.1elekt1r
.elekt2rod
.elek5tro1de
.elek5tro2ds
.e2lem
.e2len
.e4le1o
.e2le1v
.e2lex1
.e2li1a
.e1li
.2e2l3in
.e2lis
.e2lit
.el2sk
.e2ls
.el2sp2
.e4ly
.e2lä
.e2lö
.e2mal
.2e1ma
.e3man
.e2m3b2
.e2mil
.e1mi
.e2mot
.e1mo
.e2mu1e
.e1mu
.e4mus
.e4n
.e2na
.en5en
.e1ne
.e2ner
.e2ni
.e2nor
.e1no
.en4skä
.e2ns
.en4sy
.en2tr
.e2n1t
.2e2n3ä
.e2on
.e1o
.eo2n5e
.e1pa3
.e2pat
.ep1isk
.e4ra
.e2rem
.e1re
.e2ri
.er3ig
.eri4k
.e3rod
.e5ro1g
.e3ros
.e2rs4
.er5st
.e3ru
.e4sc
.e2s1k
.e4sl2
.e2sot
.e1so
.2e2sp
.es3pe
.es4te2ns
.e2sten
.es1te
.es4ter2n.
.est2er
.este2r1n
.es4ter2ns
.e1st2r
.e2t
.euk2l
.e2uk
.e2u1ta
.e1ut
.e4v4a.
.e1v
.e4va2ld
.e4vas
.e4vig
.e1vi
.e4vy
.1f2
.fa3so
.fa2s2t3s
.fe4br
.fe1b
.fe5l4a.
.fe2l
.fe1l1a
.f2e4ma
.fet2t3s
.fe2tt
.fi2ns2
.fi2sk
.f4l
.fresko1mål3
.f1re
.fre2s1kom
.fresk2o1må
.fö2ra
.för1a2n
.fö5r2an1de
.föra2n1d
.fö5ra1re
.fö5ra2r1n
.fö2ri
.fö2r1s
.g2
.ga1tu3
.ge2i
.ge5na
.1g4o
.go5no
.gummi1s
.1gu
.g2um
.gu2m1m
.gum1mi
.1gä2n2g3
.g2än
.h2a4ck1
.1h
.h5e1me
.h4e
.hi2e3
.h2i
.hi2s3t
.hi4t5
.h2jal
.h1ja
.ho2p5t2
.hu1vu2
.h2uv
.hå2lo
.hä2r5i
.hö2g1s2
.h2ö
.i4a2n.
.i1a
.i4an4s.
.ia2ns
.i5b4
.i2c
.2i4c4k2
.i4da
.i2dar
.i2de
.2i2do
.id4re
.id1r
.i2ge
.i5ge2l.
.igen3
.ik2
.i4ke
.i5kl
.i2ko
.i5k1r4
.i4la
.i2lan
.il5and2e.
.ila2n1d
.ilan1de
.i2l5ar
.il5at
.i4l5e
.il2m
.i2ma
.i2mi
.i2m3p2
.i2n1
.ina2v
.i1na
.i2n3d2
.in2ga
.i2ng1
.in4ger
.ing4es
.in4go
.ing2r2
.in5i.
.i1ni
.i2nk2
.inne3s
.i2n1n
.in1ne
.i2n5s2
.i2n3t2
.i5p1l
.i2r
.i1re4
.i2r4m
.i4sa
.i4sag
.i2sak
.i2sar
.4i1s2c
.i2si
.i2s3k
.i2s1p
.i2s3s2
.i2ta
.i2te
.itus2
.2i1tu
.i4va
.i2ver
.i1ve
.j2
.jes4
.1je
.j2e4sp
.je2s2s
.k2
.kans4k
.ka2ns
.ke5la
.1ke
.ker4
.ki2n3et
.ki1ne
.kis5ta
.k4l
.ko2br
.ko1b
.kri2ng3
.kr4
.krin2gs2
.kå5ka
.l2
.lan2d3i4
.la2n1d
.lar5me
.la2r1m
.le5na
.1le
.le4rin
.le1ri
.le5ro
.li3b
.1li
.li5kå
.li5sa
.lju4d5i
.1lju
.lj2ud
.lo2sk
.lå2go
.l2åg
.lå5re
.lå2sa
.lät2t3s
.lä2tt
.m2
.ma4lin
.1ma
.ma1li
.ma5te
.me2d3in
.1me
.me1di
.me5mo
.mini3s2te1ri
.1mi
.mi1n2i
.minis1te
.minist2er
.mo2n2s
.1mo
.monst3r
.mon1st
.mu5s4ten
.1mus
.mus1te
.mu2t3s
.må2n1s
.må2st
.må1s
.mås5te
.mä2ns2
.1mä
.män5ska
.män5s1ko
.mörk3l
.mö2r1k
.n2
.na5ra
.1na
.ne2d5r
.1ne
.ned1
.nes5t
.no4g
.1no
.nor5den
.nor2de
.no2rd
.2n1p5
.nöd1
.o2don
.o1do
.oe2ti
.o1e
.o2k5t
.o1k
.o1l4a
.o2liv
.o1li
.o2lo1f
.o1lo
.o2lym
.o1ly
.o2man
.o1ma
.o2mar
.o2m1in
.o1mi
.o2mor
.o1mo
.o2m1s
.o3m2u
.o2nan
.o1na
.on2kl
.o2n1k
.o3nö
.o1o
.oom5
.o2pal
.o1pa
.o4pel
.o1pe
.o2per
.o2pin
.o1pi
.o2pi1u
.4o1p2r
.or2d5et
.o2rd
.or1de
.o5re
.oros3
.o2rs2
.or3st
.or2t4s
.o2rt
.o3ry
.o4s5ar
.o1sa
.o4s5at
.o1sk
.o5s2mar
.os1ma
.o3sn2
.2o1s2p
.os4t5an
.os1ta
.os5ta4s.
.os2tas
.os5tat
.o4s1te
.o5s1to
.o1st1ra
.o5su
.o3s4v2
.o3så
.o1t2r
.o5tå
.o1u
.ou2p2p
.o1up
.out1
.4o5w
.p2
.pa4g2e.
.1pa
.pag2
.pa1ge
.pa1s1te
.pa3s2ti
.pat1ru
.5pe1ri3
.per5st
.pe2rs
.pis4t
.pi5star
.pis1ta
.pi5ste2ns
.pis1te
.pi5st2er
.pos2te
.1po
.po3s2te1ra
.post2er
.po3ste1ri
.2p3p
.preten1ti4
.p1re
.pre1te
.prete2n1t
.2p5sk
.påt2
.på1
.1r4a
.ra4d5en
.ra1de
.ra4d5e2r.
.ra4d5e2r1n
.ra4d5e2rs
.1ra5ra
.relea4s2e.
.1re
.rele2a
.re1le
.rel2eas
.relea1se
.reo5s
.re1o
.res3te
.re5vi
.re1v
.2r2h
.rin5g4las
.ri2ng1
.ri5o
.ris5pi
.ris5ta
.r2o2d1l
.5ro4la
.rot3sl2
.ro2ts
.ro5va
.ru2ms1
.run2d3s
.ru2n1d
.ru2n1s4
.r2w
.rå5r1n
.rå5rs1
.s4
.sa2k2a
.1sa
.sa5kad4
.sa5la
.se2b5r
.1se
.se1b
.se1e2
.se2i
.se3le
.sho5we2
.1s2h4ow
.s1h
.si2mo
.1si
.si2n3t
.si1o
.si4v
.s4jö1
.1sj
.sk2
.ske2d5an
.s1ke
.ske1da
.skid5å
.1ski
.små1
.5so2l3s
.sommar1
.s2o2m1m
.som5m2a
.sp2
.st2
.stap5l
.s1ta
.2steg5r2
.1ste1g
.s1te
.stri2n5g2
.st1rin
.stun4d5o
.1stu4n
.s1tu
.stu2n1d
.su4n
.su2p1p2
.sve2a
.sv2
.sy2ds2
.1sy
.syd1
.sym1me5
.sy2m1m
.symmet2
.så2ng3
.1sån
.så5re
.sä5ga
.1sä
.sö5ve2
.1sö
.t2
.ta3b2l2
.1ta
.ta1b
.ta4g2e.
.ta1ge
.teknis2
.1te
.3tek1n
.tek1ni
.t2e5ma
.t2em
.te3sk
.t2es
.te5v
.til2l
.1ti
.t2il
.t5i2n1t2
.ti1on
.to2kr4
.1to
.3to1k
.tre2d2s
.t1re
.tre5s
.t3s1h
.2ts
.tun2g3s1
.1tu
.tu2n4g1
.tå5re
.tå5ri
.tä5tar
.tä1ta
.u1e2
.u4f
.u2fon
.u2g
.2uk2
.4u2l2s
.u2m
.u2n
.undan3
.u2n1d
.un1da
.un2d5r
.ung2e
.u2ng1
.up2
.upp1s2
.u2pp
.u2r
.ur3us2
.u2s
.us2la
.us1l2
.u2t1
.u1t5a2
.utag5
.utom1
.u1to
.uts4å
.u2ts
.2u2v
.va4res
.va1re
.variab4le2rs
.va1ri
.vari1a
.varia2b1le
.varia1b
.variabl2
.va2r2t
.2v2d2
.v1d5a
.ve5ro
.v2e2sp
.vi2c
.1vi
.1v4o
.v2o1me
.2v1om
.vor5de
.vo2rd
.v4rak
.v1ra
.v2re
.vå2ga
.1v2åg
.våt3r
.vä4gas
.1väg
.vä1ga
.vä4ge
.wi2ki
.wis4
.x4a
.x1
.x2e5
.x4i
.x2y1
.y2a
.y2e
.y2la
.yl2l
.yl4v
.y2r
.ys4ta2d.
.ys1ta
.ys5tar
.y2t
.y1t1a
.y1t3e
.yt5r
.y2u4
.y4v
.y2vi
.å2bo
.å1b
.å4d4a.
.å1da
.å4dan
.å4das
.å2de
.å2dor
.å1do
.2åg4
.å4jo
.å1j
.å4k4a.
.å2ke
.å1kl
.å4l4a.
.å1la
.å4lan
.å2l5ar
.å4lat
.å4le
.å5lå
.å2ma
.å1m
.å2r
.å2r2s3
.å2sar
.å1sa
.å4sen
.å1se
.å2skr4
.ås2t
.å3s1ta
.å2te2
.ä2
.ä2l2s
.äm5
.ät2ta
.ä2tt
.ö2d
.ö4ga
.ö4i
.ö2k
.ö3kä
.ö4l
.ö2ls2
.öns4kades
.ö2ns
.öns1ka1de
.ö2re
.öre5n
.ö4s
.ös5k
.ö2s2s
.ös2ta
.ö2va
4a.
a1a
a2a2b
aab3e
a4ac
aa4d2e.
aa1de
a4ag
aa2r
2aba
a1b
aba5k
aba5si
abas3t
ab2be1s
a2b1b
ab2b1l2
ab3er1r
abe2sk
abe1s
abe2s5v2
abi5e
a4big
ab5i4t.
ab1la
abl2
a2b1l4a.
ab2lic
ab1li
ab2lis
ab3lu
ab5lä
3a2bo2n1n
ab1o2rt
ab2rak
ab1ra
ab4re
ab2re1v
2abu
2aby
2ac2h
ach5es
ach4e
1ac1k2o2rd
a4ck1
ack3st
ac2ks
acku2p
a5cot
ac1to5
ac2tor
a5c4y
ad2a3i
a1da
2a2dd
ade1g2
a1de
2adem
ad3ep
a4did
a1di
adi2o1g
adi2ol
ad1j
ad2mit
a2d1m
ad1mi
3a2d1op
a1do
a5do2r.
a5do2rs
ad1r
a3d2ran
ad1ra
ad2rer
ad1re
ad4rid
ad4ro1f
ad2r2on
ad2råd
a3d4rå
a2ds1
ad2se
ad2si
ad2sk
ads2pe
adsp2
ad2stå
ad1st2
ad2sö
a2d2uc
a1du
a2d3un
a1dy2
a2d3yt2
a3då
a1ed
aed3r
ae4la
ae3p
aes2t
aest5r
2afe
a1f
afe5me
af5fe
a2f1f
1affä
af2fö
afis5t
af2ra
af1ri
a2frik
af5r2on
1aft1na
a2ft
af2t5n2
1afton
af1to
aft4si
af2ts
aft3st
4afä
a1ga
a2g5a2n1f2
aga2r5a
a2g5a2r1b
ag2at
a1ge
a2ge1f
a4g5e2n1l4
a2ge2n1t
age3st
ag2g2ju
a4gg
ag1gj
ag1g2re1g
aggr2
agg1re
ag2gs2
ag2gu
ag1l
agnos2
ag1n
ag1no
ag2on
a1go
a2g3o2rd
ag2os2
2ag1r2
ag2ra1f
ag1ra
ag2rem
ag1re
agrings4ku2r.
agri2ng1
agring2sku
agrin2gs1
agringsk2
ag2ry
ag2se2n
a2gs1
ag1se
ag2s3k2
ag2sl2
ag3s2tan
ags1ta
ag1s1ti
ag2sy
ag1s2ö
a5gy
ag3än2
a5gär
2ai
aid2
a3i2n1d
a5i2nk
a1iv
a2j5el
a1je
a4je1v
a1jo
a1ju
aj3är
a1k2a
a5k4a.
a2kac
akad4
aka5d1r
a5ka2r.
ak5a2r1g
a4k5a2rt
a5kat
a4k2e1sp
a1ke
a2keu
2a1ki
ak5i2n1f2
ak3i2ng1
2ak1l
ak2las
ak2lim
ak1li
ak3lis
a3k1nä
ak1n
2a1ko
ak2rag
akr4
ak1ra
ak2rer
ak1re
a3kre1ra
a3k2res2
a1k2rig
ak3ri3s
ak4r4o.
ak3ru
ak3rä
ak2s1ke
a2ks
ak1sk2
ak2sko
ak3s1li
aksl2
ak1s2t
akta5b2
a2kt
ak1ta
1aktig
ak1ti
ak2t5o1f
ak1to
ak2tol
ak3t2ri
akt1r
ak2t5up
ak1tu
ak3ug
a1kul
a3kur
ak1v
a2kve
ak2vä2l
ak1å
akå4l
a1k2år
akå4s
ak5äg
a1kö
a1la
al5a2me
aland5er
ala2n1d
alan1de
a2l3a1no
a2la2r1b
a5la1re
ala2r1m1
a2la2rt2
a2l3a2r1v
a4la1si
ala2s5s
a3last
al3då
a2ld
4aled
a1le
a2le1f
al1eko
a2l3ekv
a2l5e2n1c
a2l3e2n1h
al3e2r1b
al4ex1
al2fa1b
a2l1f
al2ghu
al1g
alg1h
ali2ni
a1li
al1i2n1t
alk2l
al1k
al2kla
alk2r4
alk2v
al2köv
al2la1b
al1la
alla5ge
al2lak
1alle2r1g
al1le
al4l1jo
al1lj
al1lå
al3läg
a1lo
a2l3o2m1k2
alor5de
alo2rd
al3ox1
al4pak
al1p
al1pa
al2pcl
alp1c
al2plä
alps2
al2p1se
al2skr4
a2ls
als1l2
al2s1te
al1st
al2str
al2sup
al1su
al3svå
alsv2
al3svä
al3t2ar
a4lt
al1ta
al1t2r
a1lu
al5ul
3alum
al3up
alu2r
al5u2r.
al5u1re
alust2
alu5s1te
a2l5u2t1g2
alv5r
alv5äd
al1vä
alv5ät
2a1ly
al3å2r
a1lä
al5än
a4l3ä4t
a2l5ö1a
al5ög
al3öm
a3lö1re
a5lö2rs
al3ö2rt
alö2ve2
a5ma1b
a1ma
a2m3a2f1f
ama1f
am3a2n1l4
am1a2r1b
am3ar1r
a4m1av
am2bro
a2m1b
ame3dr
a1me
a2m3em
am5e2n1l4
ame1ro
a2m3ex1
a2m1f2
2a2m1h
a4mi1f
a1mi
ami1n2i3
aminis4teri1u
aminis1te
aminist2er
aministe1ri
2am5m2a
a2m1m
am2mol
am1mo
am2pak
a2m1p
am1pa
am2p1l2a
am2p1li
am2plj
am2plu
am2ply
am2p1ra
amps3l2
am2ps
am3sl2
a2ms
am5s1tu
am1s2u
am3s2å
2a2mt
am3ty
2amu
am3ug
am3ut
4amy
am3å4k
am1åt
a1mö
a2na1b
a1na
a2na1f
an5afr
a2nak
an1a2l1f
1a2n2a1ly
a2nap
a4n5a1ra
a5na1re
an1a2r1k
ana5s1ta
an2at
ana3to
an2de1k2
a2n1d
an1de
an2dis
an1di
andi2sa
an2d1ra
and1r
an2d1re
and4re1a
an3d2res
an2dri
an2dro
an2dru
an2drä
an2drö
ands1l2
an2ds
and3s1to
and1st2
and2su
an2dun
an1du
an2d2å1e
an2dän
an1dä
a4ne1f
a1ne
ane3s4ta
a2neu1
an3g2an
a2ng1
an5gav
an3g2es
an1gr2
ang2rä
ang5se
an2gs1
ang3ska
angsk2
a2ni2n1t2
a1ni
an3iso
ani2ta
an2it
an2jar
an1j
an1ja
an2j1le
anj1l
an2ki4s
a2nk
an1ki
an5klan
an1k1r4
an2k1ra
an4k1re
an2kri
an2kru
an2krå
an2krä
an2kun
an1ku
an2kv
ank3å4
ankå1l5e
3anmäl
a2n1m
an1mä
anni4s2k
a2n1n
anni1s
an1ni
annis5ka
1annon
an1no
an2od
a1no
an3o1g
ano2i
a3no1re
an2ost
an2o1va
ano5v
1an1pa
a2n1p
an4s5a2n.
a2ns
an1sa
a2n4s5a2ns
an3s1c2e
an2se2l
an1se
an5sen
a2ns3i2ns
an1si
ansi2s
ans3kul
an2s3kä
ans3kör
an1slag
ansl2
an5slä
an2som
an1so
an1st
ans2ta
ans2te
an2s1ti
ans5t2il
an2s1un
an1su
1an3svar
an1sva
ansv2
an3s4vit
ans1vi
an2s3äg
an1sä
an2te1g
a2n1t
an1te
an2tj
an2t1ra
ant5ra4s.
ant2ras
ant5rat
an2tri
ant5v
an2t1vi
3antä2n1d
a1nu
anu1s3a
a3ny
an5z
an3å
anå2re
an1år
a2n5äl
a1nä
an3ä2r
a1nö
anö2le
a2nöl
an2ö1ra
a2n5ös
anö1ve2
a1o
ao1e2
ao2pe
ao4s4ta2rs
aos1ta
a1pe
ape2n
a1pi
ap5lad
apl2a
a1plan
ap4lik
ap1li
ap3lo
ap3lå
a2polo1gi
a1po
apo1lo
apolo1g
a4pom
a2pop
apo1str
1appa1ra
a2pp
ap1pa
app3a2vs
app2av
ap2re
apre1mi2
a5pri1o
a5pry
ap2sac
ap1sa
ap4sak
ap2sar
a2p2si
ap2s3ka
a2p1sk
ap2s3ko
ap2sk2r4
ap2skä
aps1l2
ap4s1ta
a2p1st2
ap2stö
ap2så2r
ap1så
ap2t1ra
a2p1t
2a1pu
a3py
a5på1
a3pä
a4q2
a4raj
a1ra
a2rak1ti
ara2kt
a4r5and5r
ara2n1d
a4r5a2n1n
ara1p
a5ra2r.
a4r1a2r1m
a5ra2r1n
a5ra2rs
a2ra2r1v
a2ra2s1s
a4r5a2v.
1arbet
a2r1b
2a2rd
ar5dr
ar4då
are1g2
a1re
ar3e2ge
are2ko
ar3ekv
ar5e2m5b
ar3e1mo
a4r5e2n1d
a2r3e2nk
are2sk
ar5e1vi
are1v
a2r1ex1
arfö4r5i
a2r1f
ar2gs2
a2r1g
a1ri
ari5b
ar5i2b1l2
a4rigen
ari1ge
a2ri2n1t
a3ri2ts
ar4k1k2
a2r1k
ar2k3li
ar4k5lun
ar2k1n
ar2k1vi
ar2k3ö2l
ar5m4a.
a2r1m
ar1ma
ar5mas
ar2mis
ar1mi
ar2n5ag
a2r1n
ar1na
3arnik
ar1ni
a1ro
ar2prä
a2r1p
ar2p1så
ar2rak
ar1r
ar1ra
ar2rök
ar2sar
a2rs
ar1sa
ar1sk
ars2ken
ars1ke
ars4ko
ar4s1le
arsl2
ar5s1li
ar5s1mi
ars5n2
ar2som
ar1so
ar2s1po
ar1sp
ar5s2tan
ar1st
ars1ta
ars5tas
ar2svä
ar1sv2
ar5t2il
a2rt
ar1ti
ar2tin
art3i2ng1
2ar1tj
ar2t1ra
ar1tr
ar2t1ri
ar2trö
ar4tur
ar1tu
ar5t4vin
art1vi
a1ru
a4r4u.
a2r1un
a4r3u2r
1ar1vo
a2r1v
ar2vr
a1ry
a3rå
a1rä
ar5ö.
ar5ö1a
a2r3ög
ar5öv
2a1sa
a2s3ad1r
2a2s5b2
asbe2s
a1s2c
a4s2c2h.
asc2h
